Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2007
County solid waste jurisdiction area, defined.

County solid waste jurisdiction area shall mean all areas of a county not located within the corporate limits of a municipality except a facility which does not serve unincorporated areas of the county.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 7.